Mississippi, session 2026, HB1006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the City of Gulfport, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with the winterization of homes in the low-income area in central Gulfport known as "The Quarter" for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............... $300,000.00 As used in this section, the term "winterization" means improving existing homes by making necessary repairs, upgrades and energy efficiency improvements to help the home better withstand the effects of winter weather. SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.